Utah statutes.
77-41-103.   Department duties.

(1)  The department, to assist in investigating kidnapping and sex-related crimes, and in apprehending offenders, shall:

(a)  develop and operate a system to collect, analyze, maintain, and disseminate information on offenders and sex and kidnap offenses;

(b)  make information listed in Subsection 77-41-110(4) available to the public; and

(c)  share information provided by an offender under this chapter that may not be made available to the public under Subsection 77-41-110(4), but only:

(i)  for the purposes under this chapter; or

(ii)  in accordance with Section 63G-2-206.

(2)  Any law enforcement agency shall, in the manner prescribed by the department, inform the department of:

(a)  the receipt of a report or complaint of an offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(7) or (14), within three business days; and

(b)  the arrest of a person suspected of any of the offenses listed in Subsection 77-41-102(7) or (14), within five business days.

(3)  Upon convicting a person of any of the offenses listed in Subsection 77-41-102(7) or (14), the convicting court shall within three business days forward a copy of the judgment and sentence to the department.

(4)  The department shall:

(a)  provide the following additional information when available:

(i)  the crimes the offender has been convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for;

(ii)  a description of the offender's primary and secondary targets; and

(iii)  any other relevant identifying information as determined by the department;

(b)  maintain the Sex Offender and Kidnap Offender Notification and Registration website; and

(c)  ensure that the registration information collected regarding an offender's enrollment or employment at an educational institution is:

(i) (A)  promptly made available to any law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction where the institution is located if the educational institution is an institution of higher education; or

(B)  promptly made available to the district superintendent of the school district where the offender is enrolled if the educational institution is an institution of primary education; and

(ii)  entered into the appropriate state records or data system.

